District of Columbia statutes.
16-925

Privacy protection for victims of domestic violence.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate rules and establish procedures to implement safeguards, applicable to all confidential information handled by the IV-D agency or executive branch agencies in cooperative agreements with the IV-D agency, to protect the privacy rights of parties in IV-D agency proceedings. These safeguards shall include the following:

(1)

Prohibitions against the unauthorized use or disclosure of information relating to paternity, support, or custody actions in IV-D agency proceedings;

(2)

Prohibitions against the release of information concerning the whereabouts of one party or a child to another party, if a protection order has been entered (in the District or in another jurisdiction) to protect the party or the child whose whereabouts are being sought from the party seeking disclosure;

(3)

Prohibitions against release of information concerning the whereabouts of one party or a child to another party if the Mayor has reason to believe that the release of the information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or the child whose whereabouts are being sought;

(4)

Requirements to notify the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services when:

(A)

The Mayor has reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse against a party or a child; or

(B)

The disclosure of information concerning the whereabouts of the party or the child could be harmful to the party or the child; and

(5)

In cases where the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (“Department”) has informed the IV-D agency that the Department has been notified that there is reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse, requirements to determine whether disclosure of information concerning a party’s or child’s whereabouts to any other person would be harmful to a party or the child, and if so, to prohibit the disclosure.

(b)

The Superior Court shall establish procedures to implement safeguards, applicable to all confidential information possessed by the Superior Court, to protect the privacy rights of parties in paternity or support proceedings. These safeguards shall include:

(1)

Prohibitions against unauthorized use or disclosure of information relating to paternity, support, or custody actions in Superior Court proceedings;

(2)

Prohibitions against the release of information concerning the whereabouts of one party or a child to another party, if a protection order has been entered (in the District or in another jurisdiction) to protect the party or the child whose whereabouts are being sought from the party seeking disclosure;

(3)

Prohibitions against release of information concerning the whereabouts of one party or a child to another party if the Superior Court has reason to believe that the release of information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or the child whose whereabouts are being sought;

(4)

Requirements to notify the Secretary of the U. S. Department of Health and Human Services when:

(A)

The Superior Court has reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse against a party or a child; or

(B)

The disclosure of information concerning the whereabouts of the party or the child could be harmful to the party or the child; and

(5)

In cases where the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (“Department”) has informed the Superior Court that the Department has been notified that there is reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse, requirements to determine whether disclosure of information concerning a party’s or child’s whereabouts to any other person would be harmful to a party or the child, and if so, to prohibit the disclosure.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 106(i), 48 DCR 1270
Superior court, family division, exclusive jurisdiction, see § 11-1101.
This section is referenced in § 16-2348 and § 46-226.02.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(k) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-103, May 8, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 3254).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 5(k) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 105(k) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary addition of § 16-925, see § 5(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114), § 5(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 5(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 5(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 5(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-103, see § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110).
For temporary addition of § 16-925, see § 105(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-210, see § 113 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 16-925 1981 Ed., see § 105(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 16-925 1981 Ed., see § 105(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) addition of § 16-925 1981 Ed., see § 105(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 105(k) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 106(i) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).